District of Columbia statutes.
31-4423

Directors — General election procedure.

(a)

Notice of the time and place of holding election of directors of a company organized under this subdivision shall be sent to those entitled to vote, and the election shall be made by such of the stockholders and/or policyholders as shall attend for that purpose, either in person or by proxy. All elections shall be by ballot, and the persons receiving the greatest number of votes shall be directors. When any vacancy shall happen among the directors it shall be filled for the remainder of the year in such manner as shall be prescribed by the bylaws of the company.

(b)

In case it shall happen at any time that an election of directors shall not be made on the day designated by the bylaws of said company when it ought to have been made, the company shall not for that reason be dissolved, but it shall be lawful on any other day to hold an election for directors in such manner as may be provided in the bylaws, and all acts of directors shall be valid and binding as against said company until their successors shall be elected.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1150, ch. 672, ch. III, § 23

History

1981 Ed., § 35-623.
1973 Ed., § 35-523.

Prior Codifications